Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1532
Environmental Protection Act, how cited.

Sections 81-1501 to 81-1532 shall be known and may be cited as the Environmental Protection Act.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 32;

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 12;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 528, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 92;

Laws 1994, LB 570, § 12;

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 30;

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 13;

Laws 2001, LB 461, § 8;

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB413, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB809, § 9;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 15.
July 18, 2026